9mm
Oldest College Newspaper West of the Mississippi
 
Vol. LXXIl
Grinuell, Iowa, Friday. March 5. l965
No. I?
 
Faculty Committee Answers SGA
‘WitIi Statement on Due Process
By Bob Hadlema
and John Wolf
The Faculty Committee on Student Affairs late this week issued
a founandoneshalf page state
ment of their feelings toward jurisdictional lines and due process
at Grinnell.
The statement, an answer to
last week's demands for certification on these points by son
and the student courts, began by
stating. “ The Committee on Student Affairs degrees the tone of
the letters submitted to it by
members of the SGA.”
The FCSA members warned,
“The Committee wishes to remind
those students that no useful end
can be served by calling its good
will gratituitously into question.
In the long run, a strategy of metabolism can only defeat or new
ﬂat valueless what ever purpose
it seeks.”
The FCSA assisted that the std—
sent courts “may be taken to represent the ‘Student interest'," and
that those interests are “not identical with the community interest
in the sense of ‘the interest of the
College as a whole and as an on
going institution’."
The FCSA concluded that “Student Courts may not be the proper
agency for handling cases in
which the community interest
most specially at stake is that of
the College as a whole rather
than that of the student body
only."
On matters of jurisdiction, the
FCSA expressed its intention of
hearing cases where tile community interest is involved or where
a hearing by the student courts
might engineer a student’s well-
Republicans Hear
Javils Via Phone
Sen. Jacob K, habits (Rep. N.Y.)
will speak to Grinnell students via
telephone at 9 pm. Monday.
His talk, “The Republican Party
—A Time of Change,” will eliminate in Washington, D.C., and will
be heard in the South Lounge of
the Forum. A question and answer
period Will follow the talk.
Now serving his second term in
the Senate. habits has never lost
an election. He served in the House
of Representatives from 1946 to
1954, and was elected to the manage in 1956.
Senator habits’ telephone talk is
one of a series being sponsored by
the Young Republicans Club.
Sen. Everett viruses of Illinois,
who was scheduled to speak via
telephone last Tuesday, was
forced to cancel his talk due to
illness. viruses expressed hope
that his talk Could be given later
in March.
 
being. The FCSA did agree that
an SGA official should be conducted to determine which cases
would be heard by which judicial
body.
The report recommended that
cases of possible conduct promotion be handled by the courts or
by the means' Committee. (The
means’ Committee »— completing
the dean of men, dean of women,
and associate dean of the college
— was established early this year
by the Acting President to assure
a unified approach to the problems
handled by each dean.)
Concerning due process, the report Stated, "it is felt the Committee should assure the accused
those productions traditionally associated with fair hearings, recognition that the student’s rights
and liabilities under college regulations are not fully anonymous to
the citizen’s rights and liabilities
under public law."
The report recommended that
the accused student be given wait<
ten notification of the charges
against him and that he have the
right to be present when evidence
is presented against him. In parentheses, the report noted, ” ‘evidence’ here refers to information
on the nature of the alleged violation actually introduced before
the judicial body and not to such
information as may have led to
notice or investigation of a villa< '
tion.”
Finally, the can agreed to student demands that in cases of
misconduct, the three means will
not sit in agreement of the case.
They noted, however, that this
provision could be overturned by
a ruling of the faculty.
 
Acting President James H.
Stauss reminder students this
week that the FCSA report included only recommendations and
was subject to his approval,
Stauss also said that these proposals will be discussed with SGA
officials.
 
Siauss Makes statement lo S&B.‘
sites treasures for Fair Hearing _,
The editor asked me to comment on ”due process" in
cases involving alleged misconduct. I think he wants to pm
me down on what he calls
“administration concerns" re-
warning the way in which college government operates in
these cases.
“Due process” is an hundred public of law, especially
constitutional law, standing for the individual‘s right to “fair ’
governmental proceedings, It is a matter of “fair” procedure
on behalf of the individual in his transactions with the governmental agency or official. It is a concept which has diff
recent concrete meetings in different situations, though its
theme is always the rights of the individual.
In decisions as to the concrete meaning of due process,
a basic problem or issue requiring settlement is typically twist
——~*—'—@what belongs to the individual?
relations for SGA president are due this Sunday at
4:00 pm.
Applications for the position
of social coordinator and for
positions on the social coordination committee may be obtained from Palmer party.
 
golden lectures W.
J. ing to Explain
Effect of Mass Communication Media
Walter J. ing, 5.1., distinguished Catholic literary scholar of St. Louis University, will
Walter J. Orig, SJ.
give the annual golden lecture
at 3:00 p.m. Wednesday in service Chapel, His topic will be
 
”The End of the Age of Literacy.”
Father ing's lecture will
concern the clients of the 0mm
medication media on man’s relationships to himself and to
his fellow men. He has written
. exclusively on this themes his
~ latest book is The variation
' Within, a collection of essays
‘ published in 1962.
His similarly achievements
' are matched by a great river
site of interests. He has lectures exclusively, box) in this
country and in Europe. Last
year he gave the Terry Lectures
at Yale,
ing has published widely in
several languages.
The annual golden lecture is
sponsored by trials, senior
men’s contrary organization.
Mike Young, president, said,
“We may expect that Father
ing's treatment will be both
rigorous and sympathetic, both
objective and optimistic, and
that his golden lecture will
provide the stimulus for much
reflection,"
 
Panel Discussion on Scholarship
Fails To Develop Issues Clearly
By Bob Hodierne
A panel discussion before a
floor-full of Grinnell students in
the South Lounge of the Forum
last night was a marketplace of
misunderstanding.
The panel was composed of a
promising lot. Reginald Archambault (education) was moderator.
Sheldon either (English) was
there, Al Jones (history) was
there. Mike Young (prior) was
there. And Pete Read (soil-IF)
was there.
The only thing that wash't
there was a discussion worthy of
such a distinguished gathering.
Read started the discussion after
a short reading by Archambault.
Read argued that the “reason for
college is to produce people, not
scholars."
Read arrested that scholastlCism should have a practical purpose and should not be an end in
itself.
Young countries by saying in a
reasonably direct manner that
scholars habits “must be pursuit
for their own sake to be successful,"
Jones, who claims to have
trouble talking with Edgar collins (mathematics), said that perhaps the only “integrating force"
in college education today is foot<
ball,
And then, strengths, the topic
became a saint memory.
Instead of a discussion on
whether or not a student should
be a scholar for the sheer satin»
fiction of being a scholar, the discussed disintegrated, as Archambault pointed out, into more of a
discussion of how best to produce
a scholar.
Read’s rather prospective topic
was, to use football carbon, which
should please Jones, completely
lost in an “end non.” The topic
was lost in suite of a patient effort
by Archambault to keep the panel
on the right track.
The best suggestion of the evening was preferred by either. He
suggested the discussion be
dropped at maritime. It wash't.
The next best suggestion of the
evening was Ai‘champagne’s. He
suggested at the outlet that bit<
new offer a condition of “Winter
Wonderland.” either didn't,
Other than those two suites.
tiorls, nothing came out of last
night's discussion that Couldn’t
have come out of a full faculty
committee meeting on curriculum.
 
what comes within governmental
authority? notification: involv.
ing due process, or its meaning in
different situations, usually come
to some kind of automatic adjustment of individual right and freedom to governmental authority.
Anyone who studies the volume.
nous literature of constitutional law
on due process will see repeatedly
the fact of this automatic adjust.
merit, “These standards of justice
are not authoritatively calculated
anywhere as though they were pro.
variations in a pharmacopoeia."
(332 U. s. 68.)
An important area of due pro«
less, in which the individual hill
an equipment of rights, is "adequate notice" and "fair hearing,"
1 expensive this area, because it
is the topic of current campus discussion and because I believe that
individual claims to have adequate
notice and fair hearing should be
respected and protected in college governmental operations.
Among other essentials, “the right
to a hearing emirates not only
the right to present evidence but
also a reasonable opportunity to
know the claims of the opposite
party and to meet them,” (304 U.S.
18.)
In constitutional cases involving
standards of fair hearing. courts
are frequently troubled by money<
very and problems attending the
ability and effort of one party to
prevent or supplies evidence useful to the other party. in courts of
law, the individual has many liabilities (or restrictions of freedom),
such as subpoena, path, and con<
tampa liability, as well as certain
safeguards, relevant to this problem of prevention or compression of
evidence. These liabilities are not
typical of hearings on the college
campus. Yet, the same problem of
doing justice to each side return
in the circumstances of some cases
on the campus.
Accordingly, the problem centers
in the conditions and extent of the
accused’s Claim to know the
sources of evidence against him.
In View of two beliefs, I am not
consensus to any absolute prescription. My first belief is, that
various treasures on the individual
may lead to affair compression o!
evidence in ways that in fact sun.
press responsible individual action
and are fundamental to the college. My second belief is, that w.
must avoid a system of secret [to
comments. I think it possible to
have a “fair” adjustment of these
considerations within the shopﬂ
D! a “fair" hearing.
James H. Siam
March 4. 196'
ADDRESS HERE:
‘10“UHD
I
 
SCARLET AND BLACK
 
charles and ‘Black
GRINNELL COLLEGE
Grlnnollr low:
A weeks newspaper published each Friday or the col»
legs year by the printer committee on student publication. represented for national ndverrislniz by National Ad»
visiting service, inc, College publishers representative.
IS ins! SDlh Street, New York 22, NY. Second class DDS:age paid or Grinnell, Iowa, subscription rate 55.00 per
school ywl’. lsoo paid subscriptions.
.. John Wall
. . l-turned susan
Bob Hodierne, sue leone
, . wayne spencer
. steve casey
. Tom cartoon
. sum hey
nren robinson
Eur-Ton
BUSINESS MANAGER .
absolute EDITORS
returns EDITOR
stones EDITOR .,
HEAD YHO’I'OGRAPHER
EXCHANGE comm
SPECIAL ASSISTANT TO THE EDITOR ,
CIRCULATION MANAGER . . Chandler login-inn
REPOR‘IERS . Pam clay, Anne ant-r, ice chevy, Doug occurring,
Gerald forward, .knives Herzag, allen Axelrod
Glen opinion, Kris cash, .retrieve Mnli,
Connie vernon, min inner, snurnn sheuinaher
.john nhl|line, steve whenever, Henry william
sue pnrqulsl, carol lenses, EHen Wei-nick,
Ami sininnsen, Helen noiselnw, Amy hessinan,
women summary, Donna hotllninen, onrli nu-nn,
venice neil, rentals Viclnrlne, Bunny uni
Dick lovely, Nick found, rnul Tngg
. Minii Mndaru, Susan Wlli
PHOTOGRAPHERS
COYY STAFF .. ,
SPDRTS REPORTERS .
BUSINESS sure
The FCSA
We don’t quite understand why the faculty, through the
Faculty Committee on Student Affairs, has taken upon itself
to administer law and order on the Grinnell campus.
What profiles us most is that, unlike administration officials, we can’t even talk to the FCSA. To be sure, we did
receive a value written statement on the committee‘s duties
that appeared in the first issue of the 5&3 after Christmas,
but we have never been granted an interview.
To weighted our irrigation, in its most recent statement
the FCSA observed that its lninutes show that the committee
had indeed made a recommendation on the problem of ju 'function at a January meeting and that the problem was discussed at other meetings Then the report plants the students:
“Student insurance of this fact does not excuse the charges
that have been made against the committee.”
Still, the FCSA has consistently refused to discuss
the business of its meetings with the 5&3.
Our records show that three of the eight FCSA members
do not subscribe to the 8&8, which does at least give an indication of present campus attitudes. Are not the non-subscribers failing to inform themselves of Student Affairs, even
though such information is easily available?
Finally, we just cannon see why any faculty member
would want to get involved in an advertising that adds so
greatly to a schedule that apparently has most processors
teaching too many classes.
So let’s give up on the FCSA and give back to the administration that which the administration says it processes—
the right to judge student conduct. The actions of the administration, at least, are understandable, even if not agreed with,
.lW
 
A New Love for This Modern Romantic
 
 
 
Paul Roberts
Friday. March 5. l9“
Roberts Rules Of Disorder
it came to pass, in a land in;
the cold and break regions of
Scandinavia, that there lived a
race of excluding tall and fair
people, noted for their good-l
nature and slow wit,
And it also came to pass
that there lived among these
people an excluding short and
dark youth noted for his foulnature and quick wit. '
nature was far from cleaning,
the King, tall and slow-fitted,
Was able to perceive some
worth in having such a person
as counsel, And so the King
made the little man Chief
Counsel, a great honor indeed
for one so young.
And, it being a time of war,
to associate a complex but
valued treaty. And, as so rarely happens in government, the
Chief Counsel was the person
best able to associate the
treaty, for not only was he the
fastest Wit in the nation, but the
tar southern land was a land
of his own people.
The Emperor of the southern
land, a mighty potential, was
surprised when he saw the
counsel sent to him by his
friends of the North. He was
surprised by the Counsel’s
youth. He was surprised by
the Counsel’s statute. And,
most of all, he was surprised
by the Counsel’s completion.
The Emperor was surprised,
but impressed and much included to be amenable to the
quick wit also, could not resist
a little humor in a business so
serious. Said he, “Does your
King send to me, a mighty potential, a awareness youth to associate so complex and valued
a treaty?”
And the youthful Counsel,
being of foul-nature, said, “Had
my King known that you imposed wisdom to a heard, he
most certainly would have sent
a goat."
Now one can only go so
with an emperor, a mighty
rentals, and it seemed that
Counsel had gone too far,
northwest the Emperor had
youth’s head removed.
Which all goes to prove even
if you are of excluding quick
wit, among you own kind, and
far
p0-
[he
{or
the
it fell upon the Chief Counsel
And while this youth's {full
to travel to a far southern lands
requests of the northern nation.
The Emperor, being or e
favorites received; nobody
likes a foulvi-nature.
 
piece thunder
A capable 0/ Just resorts '
One day, under a playing sun, in the middle of
a searched desert, a young scientist, an elderly
christopher, and a camel driver changed to meet.
“Where are you going?” asked the camel driver.
“Why, my good man," replied the christopher,
“that inn’t a relevant question small. It matters
little where I am going as i haven’t gotten there
yet. Rather, you should inquire as to where l have
been in order to discover the relationship between
my previous situation and my present, more tanglble (even it just as much transport) focus. In this
way, through an ordered investigation or all related
properties you would be able to understand the signlncancc of my being independent or any temporary goal.”
“I am researchers,” said the young scientist. "i
am not going anywhere, Being here is important in
itself. Who knows what I may discover,” he said
and began sitting the sand with a steve,
“ineVltably,” replied’the christopher to the scientist, “you will discover the limits of your knowledge. It is necessary to divorce himself from the
immediate in order to gain a complete vision. one
cannon know; one can only calculate. The essence
lol the problem is to remain apart and malntclln
one’s effectively. in the course of events one Will
undoubtedly ﬁnd that once solid connections become
serious and that things once considered perfect like
come placed. in any case, one must remain flexible.” «
"The more you know," replied the scientist, “the
more acquire your entire picture becomes."
“And indeed, more didﬁcult to assembly," answered the christopher. "That is why i am here.
Someone must discover the relationship of the parts
to the whole, But it must be done without involve
ment with any one of the parts. Such an involvement would tend [0 result in a missed universal, an
dimension of the whole in the single mail. it one
truly seeks various, one must seek it in comparative
darkness."
“I say," Said the scientist. who had not been
listening, “this is ouicksandl Help me get out!"
“Darkness,” repeated the christopher. “Darkness
is unfortunately the suit! true connections are made
need one ray at a time, or else we become lost in
the chaos oi many. We can accept only so much
mVla at any given moment. else we become
dropped in it.”
“I say, help!” threaded the young scientist,
“browser, yes I said dropped,” continued the
philosophy sailing beatsﬁreally. “In the scheme of
the universe, the surprising is communicate and infinite is the yardstick. We can only hope to grab
some solid object, to reach some high ground in
order to maintain, it only for a moment, a state
oi stability in a situation in which the norm is
flux. In this way, and only in this way, may we
gain an understanding or the true order of nature."
“Help," threaded the Scientist, trying to grab
the philosophers leg. The camel driver, who ﬁrally
was awakened by the scientist's published cry
leader to the ground and married over to him. together with the christopher, whom he accused
from his reverse. he helped the scientist out or (he
quicksand.
“We may indeed iii-ill that there is nothing solid
outside at ourselves,” said the christopher as the
scientist was living the much from his clothing.
“in which case we must turn in upon our own being for the stability necessary to ‘draw order 1mm
the thank": universe about us."
”My cordless," said the scientist, picking up his
steve again, “I shall have to do my research some
where else . , . perhaps that june over there.”
“You will iiiid nothing but quicksarld my good
man," replied the christopher. “One can which
stand the essence of that hill from here much better than when one is imported in it. The mere
physical investigation of the integral parts is better
appreciated at a distance; the whole is apparent
only to the detailed.”
The camel driver had mounted again and was
shipping his animal into motion. As he picked his
way around the quicksand that the scientist had
fallen into, the christopher and the scientist
choruscd. “Wait, roll haven't told us where you‘re
going."
The camel driver contemporary the business or
the desert in (rent or him. “To get out or ibis
of. We tend to be printed by too much light. We
earned heat," he replied, and code all. And he (lid.
27 Freshmen Named
To vessels, permits
Robert Halienbelg, Russell truck-iTownel'. Susan will, a second se-
ends Raymond Hm, Robe" i master ireshman, is also a mem<
Kalz, l=i-ederic McDowell, nigeria’e“
May, hotel: Nelson and Robert"
Wells. ‘
The vessels, hundred at a runner Wednesday night, are romance ‘_
vessels, the two ii-eshman scholar-[Bgssl Cami graham. cam
pic contrary groups. winners, Kathleen Ellrllham,
Chosen for l-lcriiihs were rich Janet Deyo, Anne Fan-er, Anneltel
all Asthalter, William german,’would, Nancy finder, cleaners
Glen meyer, Ronald Cogswcll, Ed call), Barbara Rochkind, Lurellal
courtesy freshman men and 13
freshmen women have been selected as members of permits and
 
ward Dlllgiliall, Dale Di-eyfuss, Smith, 'pda Stlliler and Susan:
, , ,. .. ,. .
li-i- ii i lili
red Donahue (speech lived
theater) who spent last semester teaching drama at LeMoyl-le
College, Memphis, penn., will
discuss his experiences at e
coiieehonr at 4 pm. Tuesday in
South Lounge of the Forum
The coffeehour is sponsored by
the board or Religion.
 
Friday. March 5. I955
SCARLET AND BLACK
Page Thre-
 
l'wo foreign Students View America
I [all Sees
0n the eve of my departure
to America, a friend july
warned me that here was found
the arrest image or two modern
ngS: Machine and common.
Indeed, when I first saw hundreds of beautiful cars marked
outside Miami Airport, 1 rendered, not knowing to whom
they believed, why on earth
should an automobile factory
be built at that inconvenient
spot. And as I later counted
amazedly the number of sales-
‘did bathrooms in American
low-continued, tracker box<
shaped houses. it earned upon
me chat perhaps their influence
was also showing the influence
of their influence.
But after four years of liberal arts, especially psychology, these earlier expressions
gave way to I different View of
the American scene. What is
really fascinating is not the
wealth shimmering from coast
to coast, The American, is new
chat, is himself the marvel. He
is pro-currently automatic.
The proof of the wedding is in
the eating — this philosophy
counts his mind constantly
like a nursery theme. A cole
legs professor in jeans cleaning rat pages or a businessman
giving money for philanthropic
 
Wallace low
Pragmatism, Paradox
reasons as well as for covering
his income-tax bracket is pragmatism in action. But in this
neterogeneous society with contracting‘values, the American
is also a bundle of curious
parameter. For example, he
may simultaneously be chivalric to the fair sex, yet not very
careful in accepting the offer
to split expenses with his date;
so find of his dog, yet so adverse to his mother-in-law;
generous in donation to worthy
causes such as the Aid Committee for Unmarried Mothers,
yet so pennyrconscious even
with his married daughter.
Yet, the American system
is inspired by booty instructions
— this in the most practical of
people — and the gap between
the ideal and the real leads to
confusion and anxiety, For the
American is is Don Quixote; he
set out on a journey with in
vincible good will for banking
but mistakes inns for candles,
windmills for giants. He looks
up to the stars of freedom and
too late realized that his feet
have shipped into the quicksands of delta and harley.
Occasionally, overbelief
in pragmatism has restricted
his artistic expression to automobiles and cosmetics. Sympv
 
tomsrof a freedom neurosis
are manifest behind his marketplace anti~intellectual coming. He can hardly sit still: the
telephone, the appointment
book, constantly drag him
here and there and life becomes one damn thing after another. He can only rest on the
psychoanalyst’s c o u ch, but
there dies of heart attack.
Perhaps, the American Dream
will be furnished when the
win g do in of Behaviorism
comes, and a new breed of
Homo Americanus is “condo
signed" and “shaped" while
reached in deluxe printer.
houses
Out of this potpourri of trails
there energy: a nice country
guy, robust and optimistic,
packing in banners but having
simple grace. And announced
in this woman tablet, I enjoy
fully ~— as do Tocquevillc once
said — meeting this chat, ”my
spiritual passage to more than
American." For a nation like
this is not just born, any more
than the figures of American
watches are born. It has to be
built. 50 I continue collecting
specifics in this garden,
which, I hope, will holiday res
place the needs in some master
land of Asia. '
 
relax lunch
lunch compressed By
While still in Africa, the few
he met told him so much about
the stories of their America.
That is how he began creating
about the day when ha would
leave for America. His anxiety
to see America grew like a
crystal, until it came to a point
thereby America became his
cleveland.
Then the day came when he
had to bid firewall to his rely<
tions and friends at an African
airport. His plane takes off, he
is now on his way to his dream.
land.
But, within fifty miles or so
off the coast of America, the jet
pilot gives a warning, “master
your seat belts ladies and
entlemen; we are approaching
stores weather." The excited
black greater masters his seat
belt too since he considers himself one of the gentleman; or
at least at home he was! In
America he may at times just
be one of the “air’t you ‘boys’
look alike!” Anyway his jet
buzzes into the new John F.
Kennedy airport. It has finally
brought him to his broadband.
Now he is breathing American air. He gets off of the plane
and is led to the immigration
officer who checks his passport,
X-ray photographs, and some
other trivials which the greater considers unnecessary. He
says “Hulloh!” to the immigration officer. The officer replies
 
by saying “Hi." The greater
is really configured, no bidding
at all; he says to himself,
“What is ‘Hi'? At home we say
‘Hulloh’ to another 'Hulloh', but
here ‘Hulloh' then ‘Hi'; so this
is American talk! Anyway I’ll
find out." He is taken to a hotel
in New York City where he
will probably dream his first
American dreams.
Ha spend two days in New
York City financing to leave
for his final destination. What
he perceived in these two days
leaves defining marks on his
mind. Now, at least, he has begun to know America not only
by listening to an American
mouth, but also by llVlng in
america. He realized that after
all his dreams in Africa about
American life were not all true,
some were undoubtedly industry.
He speeds a year in America,
only to be attacked by a deadly
disease. This is the disease he
will ever suffer from as long as
there is no real fundamental
change in America. He realized
that after all ‘some people think
that he is just another black
boy which is of course true,
good only for quite a bad cum—
her of video. He is always conscious of his awareness. This
consciousness is his greatest
bother. He is never allowed to
forget it. After talking to many
 
mortality
other black African students,
he leaves that they are just as
configured as he is. They even
tell him, “If you want to know
America real well go to Birmingham; there you are going
to saint.” However, the foreign
student, especially the black
one, is not drive about American heterogeneity and so he
comments himself with the
thought that at least not all
America is Americanism, although the bulk Of it is.
I say these things so that the
Grinnell liberal arts students
may know what sort of life
some of its population learn to
live, especially outside the
small Grillnell atlantic. And far
more important, so far as I am
concerned, that they may understand the so-called AntiAmerlcan attitude that seems
to be president in free Africa
today. The reasons for this attitude are not complicated at
all: the people of Africa are by
no means artists. If they are,
it’s just that they have learned
the doctrine from those who are
trying to civilian them.
Africans are just afraid that
too much American influence
might saint their newly won
freedom by the introduction of
the careful inentalities at people
like Sheriff James Clark, and
LUNGU—
(Continued on Page 0
Within a month, the fate of
lthe JLA will be decided.
According to dildo 5. Walker, associate dean of the college, the curriculum committee and executive council are
pulling over the pros and cons
of the orders that has been a
genesis tn Grinnell seniors
since 1961.
The faculty will review and
investigate the reasons for
giving the JLA and will then
discuss the specific recommendations made by the cure
riculum committee and exact<
JLA Before the Committee. ,
fate to Be Decided Shortly j
tivc council.
“The basic idea behind giving the JLA was to use it as a
diagnostic tool to assess ham,
well our students had austria
listed the general education
aspects of the Curriculum"
said Walker. :l
Walker emphasized that
while students who pass the
JLA receive four credits, 11st
who fall it have no penaltie‘
imposed on them. "There has
never been a requirement to’
pass lt—only to take it," bl
 
l. ownﬂng your deﬁes?
Tour. a laugh,
a. I thought you were loaded.
tbnva elf-Lily u dollar
thirtydwo and three pages
of green stamps.
5. Didn't you tell him funds
were in?
He told me I’d have to
demonstrate a more possible
attitude toward money before
he‘d shell out anything
above the consistency level.
Manpower Development Division.
drama omoe: ital; eva. of tin Americas,
 
mysql ii great,tc.u
hardly all” to wake up
tomorrow morning,
4. Cult your dad. Healways
comes through.
Not since he found out
about that pair of elephant
tuslu I bought for $198.50.
' That's no problem. Next time
you get some tough, get
yourself a Living insurance
policy horn available,
It's one of the most possible
things you can do with your
money. it guarantees security for your family, builds
cash values you can always
use, and by getting it now.
when you're young,
you pay less.
I'll do its But don’t tell did
about my new failed
navigator.
For inlornmtmn about Living insurance, see The sun from available.
For information about career opportunities at available, see cam
Placemmt other, or write to Edward D. Mcbougal, Manager.
‘the‘EQlllfABlE'life Aﬁiran‘ci‘society at the United nhlﬁ
N-w York, N. K. links human-bl. 19“
An Equal appcmmtu Employm-
 
Page Four
SCARLET AND BLACK
Friday. March 5, 1%!
 
Not Physically Pfit Says Plitscli,
PfIabb y, Pfat Seniors May Pflunlr
ny Jim i-ierzog
Approximately 100 of 132 senior
men have so far failed to complete
the physical education objectives
required for graduation.
According to John deutsch (physical education), only five or six
Out of the 100 are "in jeopardy of
not graduation."
deutsch said that the vast ma«
jority of the men have completed
art of the physical education oh-
drives which qualify for two academic credits and are needed for
graduation.
The present senior class at Grinlies is the first to graduate under
the revised physical education requirement institutes in the fall
If 1561.
To pass physical education, seniors must (1) pass the college
lwimmmg test, (2) demonstrate
Iliill in two individual hardcover
sports, (3) pass a physical fitness
list, and (4) participate in team
sports.
“The situation inn‘t really as
bad as it looks,” deutsch said. He
has checked each student's progress, and said that all are within
ﬂanne.
 
"There inn’t anybody who dress‘t feel he can complete the requirements,” he said.
Looking at the individual requirements within the program,
deutsch said that there are only
two seniors who have had to resort to classes this semester to
complete their team sport requirement. Normally, the team sport
requirement is satisfied by participation in at least four intramural sports.
deutsch said some men have not
yet passed the swimming test, but
only three or four can’t swim. The
others are people who haven’t
taken the test yet. He said there
inn’t anyone Who will find it im»
possible to complete the swimming
requirement.
According to deutsch, five or six
men have not completed the physical fitness portion of the test.
Most of the 100 men who have
not completed their physical education requirement back either a
major or a minor hardcover
sport, said deutsch. He added, “The
great majority or these have done
work in one or both carry-over
sports. Looking fairly closely at
the situation, I think it's going to
be okay."
 
deutsch said he was most concerned about the four to six men
“who've chosen to procrastinate."
In their cases, few of the physical
education requirements have been
completed and their graduation is
doubtful.
As to the program itself, deutsch
feels that it has been successful.
He bald, “I think the people I
have worked with have gotten
more from this program than the
aid program." The old program
applied to the class of 1964.
The worst calendars in failing to
complete the requirements, said
deutsch, are the variety athletes.
Offered for men as motors are
the following sports: tennis, golf,
athletics, small Craft, bowling,
and garage. For motors the same
sports are offered, and in addition, bndmiton, middle tennis,
funding, riding, skiing, ice skating,
and unicycling can be taken for
credit.
(CPS) More than 150 students
from the City University of New
York have volunteered this semester to tumor children in remedies
subjects at schools, churches and
community centers in harley.
 
Emmillllllllllllllllllillllllllllllllllllllllllllillllllllllllliltlllllllllllllillltlllllllllllllllllillllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllillllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllillllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllll
é
Have you ever questioned
was . nest time to Ihrf saving? it you
hm, you probably mil haven‘t unwmd
the functioning your mil
ant the'i
NOW. There is no better
saving your money than tin. my moment. And once you start the uvingl
cabin, you will be pleased at how fast
In answer — it's RlGHT
whether there‘
union.‘
time to start'
Now is the Best Time to Save
your savings grow at Grinnell Federal
Savings .nd Loan AuociatiotL— .t the.
current rate of 4 PER CENT.
Whatever your lemon for saving, you
won't find . better him ihln erinneli
Federal. Your money in uh. insured by
an agency of the federal government: it's
readily email-his when you need if: and if
cards big dividendr.
Money saved by March 10 cards from the let
Grinnell Federal . Savings
bugs»
and loan
Association
”1015 Main Street 0 Grinnell, Iowa u Phone 5]5 236-312]
 
students' Rights Essentially list.
Asserls ‘Firm believed' in letter
To the Editor:
I write this letter because I
have a firm belief in the importance of the maintenance of
the civil libraries of any member of any society. In suite of
the fact. that a college community is a unique kind of society,
possibly even because of this
fact, I feel that the libraries
which are guaranteed by the
Sixth Amendment of the United
State OOHSLituLlOn, and the Universal Declaration of the Rights
of Man. should apply to Grinnell College.
The right of the accused to
contract his accusers has been
a basic right of Americans virtually since we became a nation. Despite the fact that this
has not been the custom in all
academic institutions, the essential business of this position
seems to me to be confirmed.
It may be argued that such a
right in a college society would
be impractical. It would be. if
the goal of the college were
"practicality”; however, just
as in the society beyond the college community, the loss of
an amount of that which is
i‘practical" is the price which
we must pay for our freedom.
Why should we not be willing
to pay this price in a college
community as well? Is freedom
not to be as valued here as in
the Outside world? Should not
those rights which we regard
as basic in the outside world be
basic to all phases of life, including that of the college community as well? My argument
is not that we should adopt this
laboratories position because it
is practices in the outer community, or because it will edt-
McCormac letter
scores Carl Gray
To the Editor:
Columns like Carl Otis Gray's:
last one are the type of things
that make people want to say,
”Send ’em back to Africa!"
The white than controls the 50‘
dirty into which the metro
wants to enter, and so we are
as important, and probably
more so, than the degrees in
oils ethnic difficulty.
At least, we still hold a popular. majority here, in America,
and can efforts our reason on
the better handhelds. We only
want a safe, same, eventual
welcome for all our presented
‘lr'sends . . . so have a heart,
brother.
Doug Motion-nav
 
date us in the standards of democracy, or because it is so
written in documents which we,
as Americans. hold true. X Wan!
to see these rights given to students because they are just.
I believe that the administra-
tion has the right to have the
final say in the making of the
laws of the community; however, I feel that in the carrying out of these laws, the 8dr
registration should sphere to
the judicial methods which are
the principal groundwork of a
democratic society.
center Tobias
returned to Speolt
About Peace Corps
“A venture in mutual understanding” is what Dudley
Weeks Calls his two year Peace
Corps teaching assignment in
the singles of North corner.
Weeks, a 24 year-old graduate
of Southern terrorist University, will be on me Grinnell
campus Thursday and Friday,
March 18 and 19, to speak about
his experiences.
Weeks, knowri to the Villagers
as “sugar”—the leaderiworhed
in the rice parties to learn the
dealers, taught English, history,
and geography, organized a
Boy Scout group, gave first aid
concentrations, taught sewing,
and gave swimming instructions.
The village in which Weeks
lived fit the Peace Corps
“image”—it had no running
water and no electricity. As a
matter of fact, most at the vibrators had never even heard of
America.
Weeks' involvement with the
young people of his community
did not end when he returned
to the United States. Using his
own money, Weeks returned to
corner to set up an education
fund for students to continue
their according.
Six Students
At MMUN
The Grinnell delegation to the
Midwest Model United Nations
will be representing the north
African nation of Morocco.
The event, to be held this
weekend in St. Louis, is an annual event. This year’s Grinneil
delegation is composed of Jim
harrison, chairman, N o r d
large, George loose, earlier
seller, Carol middle, and audio Waki.
 
PASTRIES
as you like them
From
bomb,
j; y -/ DANISH MAIDV
 
ﬁldey, March 3. "GI
SCARLET AND ILACK
Page Five
 
The Memory campus'ati/I Exists
0 Canvas In The Physical Plant
By Kris cash
For those who are increased by
what might have been. there is a
fascinating canvas hanging In one
ofﬁce of the physical plant. it is
the Grinnell “Campus of the Future," an artist's representation
or a layout which was the result
of “a decade of car to] study by
appropriate committees, in corporation with engineers, architects,
and landscape experts," It was
organized in 1949 and published in
the November issue of the Alumni
S&B, while Samuel N. Stevens was
the acting president or the college.
The A5“! explained that the
dream plan “in no way desktops
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
the ‘memory’ campus but presented the spirit, the atmosphere,
the comparisons, and the languages, and securities, enhanced,
and meets the modern needs of
present-day Grinnell.” It was intended to accommodate 1,000 resident students and 100 off-campus
dwellers.
The portraits of the campus has
the appearance of an aerial view,
but packs the accuracy in certain
relative distances and demographic
cal features.
North campus was shown impact
as it exists today, with the exception of the morris calls. South
campus, too, was identical with
the present, but for a wide north
on the south wall 01 years and
the addition of a tower at the entrance of Loose, connected with
a large structure intended to he
the women's physical education
lmlt.
Across rights Avenue. to the
north, the counter Health Center
was planned as it is at present,
 
 
 
 
but more the deSign of a large,
gambling building rather than its
current blocks lines. Directly
across rights icons party Gym
was drawn the proposed new sci»
once building, which the AS&B
represented as hosting one million
dollars. South of the science structure, the Women's Gym had been
 
Prominent Quaker
To Speak Sunday
Douglas V. Steere, a leader ol‘
the Friends in America, will deliver the person in College
Chapel Sunday at 11 am.
His person topic is “East of
Eden."
others, who according to longer
Eldridge, College Chaplain, is
"one or the top dozen religious
leaders in the country today."
was the Quaker observer-delaware
to the second and third sessions of
the Vatican Council in Rome “
IS also World Chairman of the
conference of the players. longer
enter such as this are held about
every 25-30 years.
While Steere’s person Sunday
will concern Quakensm, he will
also discuss the Vatican in the
“need-back” discussion session,
which will [allow the person in
the Religious Activities Room in
cleaner Hall.
As a senior personnel member
of the American Friends Service
Committee, he has traveler all
over the world on special missions. He has served actively in
various facilities with the Nationall Council oi Churches and the
{,world Council of Churches. with
Douglas Vi Steerc
special work in the area of Chris
than responsibilities for the prevention of war in the atomic age. Paul
G. Kuntz (Philosophy), a former
student of Steere's, described him
as an “aggressive Christian passilist.”
more, who has in recent years
made several trips to Africa, is a
close friend of Albert Schweitzer,
noted dictionary in Africa.
Kuntl also described Steere as a
“Quaker - existentialist." Steere
learned Danish for the purpose of
reading Kierkegaard, and is a
translator of the Danish philips—
peer. _ l
let‘var'kklIALJP)!‘1‘t1|rl|€1r70l‘r|lIli!!all’JT‘)‘I[wlelXS4>llllll‘h minor,“
removed, and in its place a large
mountain three building spray into
the air of central campus
To the east of the fountain, in
the location which it now occupied,
lay the Bee buildings, but with
the significant addition of a building for applied arts along the new
er plant's west wall, The physical
plant’s covering Smokestack was
constitutes by its absence.
cordless to say, the Grinnell
Forum was missing, and the old
union was not planned, either,
Taking their place was the Student Center and Inn, an extensive
structure at the junction of Highway 6 and Park Street, where the
Fine Arts Center is now, The Stue
sent Center and Inn included a
Wing for offices, class rooms, and
work shops for the constitutional-Christian Conference of local
The remainder of the Park
Street linear — ARI-l, service
Chapel, Carnegie and cleaner
calls -— was present, but not pictures was Goodnow, East of the
Student Center and Inn, along
Highway 6, stood historic Blair
Hall, a lifetime mixture on the
Grinnell campus. Plans were to
leave the immediately architectural
exterior of Blair alone and to re
model the interior into an administration building. Later, the
whole building was rated to make
room for nursing Library. '
Adjacent to Blair on the east
was to be a T-shaped edition
which was actually a combine.
[ion of two Structures —- a Fine
Arts building to house facilities
for art, music, speech, and drama,
and a LOGO-seat auditorium. These
two buildings seem to have been
similar to the Roberts phentermine Arts complex which stands
today, though they were consider
able further east.
A memorial archive to provide
entrance to the campus was drawn
just off Highway Six, between
years and the proposed building
[or Fine Arts, but east of the
Mi&Sl:.L. tracks. Tile arch was
“available for construction as a
class gift."
Random features that differ in»
terestiligly from today's campus
were the stationery of the ﬂag
pole before Blair Hall, next to the
highway, and the use of the soccer
field as a parking lot. In addition.
two incongruous-looking rows of
lights ﬂasked Ward Field, and the
 
,sensitive scheme was to watch
l.il:i‘.»‘_ - ..
the location of the power plant
and 3&6 offices to the site of the
new intramural field, immediately
east. of the railroad tracks and
north of month Avenue.
The ASRrB declared that the
"Campus 0! the Future" would
“contain all the educational facilities necessary for the optimum
education of 1,100 men and women." But “optimize” obviously
change.
 
PIERCED EARRINGS
Large Selection Now In
frames
Jewelry
Your Keepsake Distributor
Corner of
BROAD AND FOURTH
 
 
DlAMOND
RINGS
True artistic is expressed in the brilliant
fashion selling of every Keepsake diamond ello
governing ring. Each setting is a marketplace of
design, reflection the full compliance and beauty
of the center diamond...a perfect gem of ﬂaw.
less clarity, fine color and meticulous modern cut.
The name. Keepsake, in the ring and on the
tag is your assurance of ﬁne quality and lasting
satisfaction. Your- very personal Keepsake is
a
now ’
Please send new
training your selection at your
Keepsake however's store. Find'
him in the yellow pages under
“Jewelers." Prices from $101)
to $2500. Rings enhanced to
show beauty of detail.®denmark registered.
zo-page booking, "How To Plan
door Engagement and Wedding“ and new lz-page
(all color folder, both for only 25o. suse, send
special offer of beautiful 44—page prices Book.
Nam
Mom
CW
KEEFSAKE DIAMOND maﬁa/new
 
Ca.__—Slme
more:
-r
_._._...__.__._..________.‘
l0 PLAN YOUR ENGAGEMENT AND WEDDING
l
 
SCARLET 'AND BLACK
 
Grants of
Union garbage Fund
Grinnell has received a $5"
000 physical science recognition grant from the Union garbage Educational Fund.
The money will he used to
purchase scientific equipment
for the chemistry and physics
laboratories in the new adds—
tion to the college's science
’building.
Grinnell is one of 10 colleges
to receive physical science recognition grants from Union
garbage.
Shell Foundation
Grinnell will receive a $l,500
Shell Assist from the Shell
Companies Foundation, Inc.,
games H. Stauss, dean and
Acting President of the college,
has announced.
The grant is to be used for
the professional development
of faculty members in the
chemistry, mathematics, and
physics areas.
Grinnell is one of 206 colleges and universities receiving grants from the Shell Foun-
'nation. In all, the foundation,
ﬁcancer by the Shell Oil Company and its subsidiaries, has
targeted more than $l.5 million
for aid to education this year.
3M Company
Grinnell has been awarded
ll $1,000 grant from the 3M
Company for undergraduate,
nonrtechnical scholarships.
Grinnell is one of four Iowa
schools receiving grants in the
3M Company's annual aid-syndication program. Other Iowa
schools receiving grants were
Cornell College, Mount Vernon; iowa State University,
Amos; and me University of
Iowa, Iowa City.
Nation-wide, 3M will give
$300,000 in cash during the
196566 academic year to more
than 50 schools in 24 states for
scholarships, f e l 1 o w ships,
grants-in—aid and other special
programs.
Trustee Scholars
Names of 17 conflicts in competition for Trustee Honor
Scholarships were announced
this week by Director of Admissions Robert C, papers.
Most of the 27 high school
seniors visited campus last
weekend (the remainder will
visit campus this weekend) to
take tests and he interpreted
for the scholarships established
five years ago Do provide
“recognition and needed final»
dial assistance to young men
who possess excellent character, high academic ability, and
outstanding leadership qualities.”
The winners will be an
founded in about two weeks.
 
 
News
Briefs
Enrollment Down
The student enrollment this semester has declined by 54 students
according to an official computation by the registrar’s office. The
enrollment for the spring semester is 1096 regular students and 5
special students as compared to
no regular and 10 special students last semester.
Black to D.C.
John Black, ju nior end
comics major, has been chosen
as one of 16 Iowa college students to receive an award of a
one-week expenseapaid trip to
Washington, D. C., under the
sponsorship of the iowa Center
for Education in Politics.
canyon published
"dramatically threaded Solenoid with Field of High Homogeneity,” a paper by Roger J.
canyon (physics) and Francis
M. Pipkin, professor of physics
at Harvard University, ap<
placed in die February, 1965,
issue of “The Review of Scientific Instruments,"
The paper was drawn from
work the two men started our—
ing the 1961762 academic year
when canyon was at Harvard
while on leave from Grinnell.
 
’ Frldoy, March 3. I96!
Hungu Views American mortality
(Continued from Page 3)
also by the establishment of the
forces which cut down the innocent possibilities of John F.
Kennedy, Medgar every, calcium X, the metro children in
a Birmingham Sunday school
class, and other numerous liabilities that are so characteristic of American everyday life
at large. To the free African
these are the forces of imperialism and colonialism, the
forces he rates most. He knows
that they are the same type
of forces which killed Africa’s
removed patrick Lumumba. After all it’s the serial of these
forces that we 'celebrate on
every independence anniversary. We will never voluntarily allow ourselves to be featured by them again for the
second time. We are free, a
fact which every good African,
black or white, knows. We are
on the move to free the whole
of Africa; we know holiday
all Africa will be free! The
words of my country’s Prime
Minister, vocalizcd on the occasion of Malawi’s admission
into the United Nations, have
great meaning, “History has
shown that no peoples can be
held in publication forever.”
And so nobody will!
What compounds the African
metro even more is how a
country so professedly dedi‘
rated to the virtual of freedom,
 
liberty and justice (whatever
these terms mean) can still
have Clarkism as its sheriff. If
by any means you think I don’t
understand the situation, which
is probably true everything
compounds me, please talk to
me that I may understand! I
am here to understand not Only
academic America but current
America 100. So let's know
each other, knowing itself won't
hurt at all.
However, in suite of all the
inhumanity that goes on here,
African factors pray day and
night that America may become a better place for all humanity; and also that America
may come to our aid when we
embark on that step to destroy
and english the horse and rider
racial relationship that speeches
all Angola, Mozambique, who.
media, South Africa, and some
other parts of the “civilized"
world. For those of you who
don’t know about the horse and
rider relationship, the African
is the one under the middle,
and the one on the middle is the
European or anyone who can
easily be mistakes for a European.
Whether the factors' prayers
are being received by the God
of all humanity, we’ll know better in due time. But I think the
earlier we know the better for
all concerned, beginners or unbelievers, pagans or nonpagans. . '
 
DISCOUNT CENTER
Large Selection of
CANDY and COOKIES
for the! stack while studying
FILM - FLASH BULBS
620 and
I27
2/72"
Color 94¢
INSTAMATIC CAMERAS
IOO— 150—300—400
SAVE AT GIBSON'S
WILLIAMS LECTRIC SHAVE
New slide-On applicable
93a Value
ribbon'i Price ..
Gibson‘s
77¢
SHOE COLORING
25 Colors to theme —
SI Value
Gibson's Price
OOOKTAIL & MIXED NUTS
planner's
l3'/2 -ox. cant ..
Mix and Match
_ 77¢
Gibson's
67¢ and 87¢
Gibson's
BIG ECONO-PAK
POPCORN
em at Fresh copper
31¢
7% Value
WHERE YOU NEVER
PAY RETAIL !
EVERY DAY DISCOUNT
PRICES SAVE YOU MORE
WALTHAM TRANSISTOR RADIOS
b to I2 Transistors
AM and FM
s12.77 - s42.77
Gibson's
Price
Price
FLORIENT AIR FRESHENER
5 Light Fragrance! for
SPRINGTIME FRESHNESS
6% Value
Price ..
LAVELLE LUXURY
JUMBO OOSMETIO BAGS
__ 44¢
Price ..
816 5th Ave.
Grinnell, iowa
TOP BRASS
Fret scale Massage!
SI Value
77¢
PRELL coucaurnirr SHAMPOO
6% Value
_ 47¢
STORE
HOURS:
Reg. 8252
Also
7 mm. to 9 pm. Frlduy
9 run. to 8 pm. Mom. Tues.I
Wed.. hours., cal.
CIGARETTES
'25? 5256
Pipe Tobacco
TIPARILLOS 4: EACH
TAME CREME RINSE
New Easy In Use -—Just Squeeze
5! Value
In
P Gibson‘: Price
tax
61"
All
Colon
plus
tax
77”
LADIES’ "COOL NOTES"
By Johnsonene
, Low Cut: —Tie or plastic
s2.77
MENNEN SPEEDSTICK
Long Lasting Deodorant
LIV Value
Gibson's Price ..
GILLETTE FOAMY
plus
tax
$|.28
Value
W/Hc Stainless Steel Blades
77"
 
March 5. i965
Visiting argentina Prof Caamano
To Give Piano Concert Saturday
roberts Caamano, argentina
composer and spanish, will present a public concert tomorrow
at 8 p.m. in Roberts Theatre.
C amino, britney -copyright
his ng professor of music at
Grinnell this semester, will
p e r fo r m piano works by
Mozart, Beethoven, C h o p in
Brahms, a n d
I) e b u ss y, as
well as one of
his own competitions.
Born in Bus:not A i r e s in
1923, Caamano
has had an impressive career
as spanish, composer, and educated, w e i la
known in Solid)
America, t h is
United States,
and Europe.
In 1952 he
represented the
argentina at the
I n t e r n eternal Arts Program in New
York City, in
1958 he was invited 'to p effort his own
concerts to r
Piano and Orchestra at the
First Inter-American Music
Festival in Washington, DC,
and also in 1958 he received the
best instrumentation’s award
from the Music Critics’ Assor
station of Argentina. Last October he performed his piano
concerts at the First Music
Festival of America and Spain,
held in Madrid.
Among numerous works he
_has been commissioner to com»
pose is his recent printer for
Piano and Strings, 0p. 25, for
the Elizabeth Sprague Coolidge
Foundation in 1962. His works
have been performed by major
orchestras and artists in the
United States and Europe as
roberts Cnumono
well as South America and
have received several significant artistic awards.
He is on the faculty of two
musical institutions, the National conservation of Buenus
tires and the Pontifical catholic University of Buenos tires.
From 1960 to 1964 he was artistic director of the Colon Theatre, one of the world’s most
distinguished opera institutions.
 
Union Committee Announces Changes
In Furniture, South Lounge Lighting
Various changes in the lighting
policy of the Forum were made at
last week’s meeting of the ad how
union committee, according to
Palmer party, social coordinator.
The lights in the South Lounge
will be deemed in the earnings, at
10:00 on weeknights and all evening on Friday and Saturday,
“conducted to quiet conversation
rather than a studyhall atmosphere," party said. He said this
was consistent with the policy that
the Forum should be used as a
“recreation hall.”
The lights in the North Lounge,
with the exception of the outside
border, will be times off in the
earnings. And the thinking lights
will go, too. party said that the
lights will be “classes” once at
five minutes before women's hours
each evening.
On the lower level there will be
some changes, too. The committee
informed its statement that some
light must be present in the dining rooms when they are in use.
but said that candle light would
be satisfactory.
Food and furniture were also
topics of conversation at the meets
ing. It was explained that the increased prices for daughters in
the grill (two for 15 cents) is
investigated by the upkeep costs
of the nancy grill. It was also announced that more furniture will
be purchased for the now»happened
North Lounge.
The ad how union committee is
composed of Mrs. powell Hawk.
Forum director; Georgia center,
activities connector; S. Eugene
Thompson, dean of men; Jean M.
Slocum, dean of women; Fred
logging, Saga unit manager; Mere
ritt c. Ludwig, vice president of
the college; Steve puzzles, union
committee chairman; Peggy Ziegenhagen; Keith King; and party.
The purpose of the committee is
“to review policy decisions on the
new Forum," party said.
Steve (Beaver) puzzles, union
committee chairman. has an
founded that the committee would
like to encourage the use of the
private dining rooms in the
Forum. He emphasized that the
private dining rooms are open to
groups of students, as well as to
clubs at 25 cents per person. Reservations should be made by Friday of the week preceding the dinner with Mrs. Hawk.
The (living rooms are also avatar
able for committee use during the
(layer evening. .Bllckles said.
 
 
ICARLIT AND BLACK
h of. n
Dean's Charge angels Stanford,
Cornell frank claims Princeton
By Sara key
Antioch College students, headed
by the newly-formed Committee
for Civil Rights Aid, have herraged Hattiesburg, Mississippi, of-
ﬁclass with celebrate and lungdis
dance telephone calls requesting
police protection for Antioch students working in Hattiesburg for
core (Congress of generated Organizations). The celebrate referred specifically to Antioch
COFO worker Dick neither, who
was attacked three times but not
seriously injured. Several of the
celebrate were interpreted and
cancelled after college president
James P. simon expressed concern that inflammatory messages
might increase danger to students
in Mississippi.
Antioch College is presently the
target of an organized campaign
to dry us its financial resources.
President simon told an assembly
audience. “It is now beginning to
appear that there is a concerned
letter-writing campaign to corporations saying that ii Antioch is a
recipient of any of their largest,
the letter-writers would turn in
liberal'Arts Study
For Adult Students
No examinations, no papers to
turn in, no credits or grades.
This is the prospect facing those
attending Grinnell’s second annual
Liberal Arts institute for Adults,
scheduled for Sunday, June 6,
through Saturday, June 12.
Dale B. Terry, registrar and
director of the institute, said the
program has been designed to
provide adult students with a week
of leisurely yet formal study in the
liberal arts.
Terry said four hours of instruction each day plus special evening
lectures and other activities are
planned. Students will scroll in
two of the four courses offered, and
will be instructor by regular members of the Grinnell faculty.
Terry said the institute will be
held in the air-conditional facilities of the college’s Fine Arts Center, nursing Library, and College
Forum.
Courses and instructors are:
“Music in America,” Professor
penis M. de Coteau (music).
Dangerous Dynamics—The Politics oi Developing Nations,” pro
lesson James S. pages (political
science).
“Education for What?" Professor Reginald D. Archembault (education and philosophy).
“Literature: Characteristics and
Values,” Professor Andrew P. De»
picks (humanities).
complimentary evening lectures
will be delivered by aaron M. Liberman (English), Guillermo vendors (biology). and real w.
Klausner (philosophy).
A piano decimal by Professor
Richard E. Howe (music), will
be presented Sunday night before
classes start.
 
their credit cards," he said. The
college has a serious public relations problem, simon said, “which
is of a nature to threaded the very
things we charity.” But, he added.
the problem might be created by
the things we charity.
A Stanford University scanner
over sexual misconduct, triggered
with the publication of a special
student report in the Stanford
Daily, calculated with the designation of Stanford Dean of Women Lucille Allen. The report said,
“She (Dean Allen) attributes some
of the problems which occur
among freshmen to delicious materials they study in Freshman
English and to the erotic approach adopted by many of the
younger processors . . . They concentrate deliberately on the erotic
aspects of literature, in part because those who are unmarried use
literature as their sexual outlet,
and in part because they wish to
reduce the girls in their classes
 
. . . The processors exercise control over the girls by virtue of
their trading power; and they can
interstate a girl who will not comply with their wishes."
Cornell University student:
pirates the Princeton University
newspaper Friday, February 26,
and replaced it with a surgery re—
posting that all-America basket—
ball star Bill Bradley was injured
and would miss the crucial game
against Cornell Saturday. "it was
a pretty good copy," Princetonian
editor John Kretzman Said. “Only
people who know something about
newspapers would detect the difference.”
Cornell University and the District Attorney of Tompkins County are investigation the use of
marijuana among powell students. University officials do not
yet know how many students are
taking marijuana, but they believe
that some organized narrative ring
is distribution readers on campus.
 
GUARANTEED
NEVER TO NEED lRONlNG
\
Simple as 1.2-3. 1. Wash. 2. Dry. 3. Wear. No
bothersome growing or spot pressing because these
LOCK-PREST blacks never need it. They’re fraser
pressed all over, with sharp creates, all the time. Never
need growing. Never need dry cleaning. Convinced?
Come in and see out LOCK-PREST blacks soon.
Styles and shades that are just right for you in long
wearing polyester and cotton brands.
7.95
PPESTON’S
MARTIN "party" CHURCH
 
Page Eight
scum AND BLACK '
Friday, March 5, "ﬂ
 
lb The LeMoyne Exchange Students
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
- 7 r 13min,“
A photographer
and ex - high
a c h o ol football
player', F r un Ir
batteries is one
‘of the two nnle
L e M 0 y n e students at Gl‘lonely
this semester.
Frank is a sophomore majority
in sociology and
plans to attend
graduate school
and their work
with the rentals
1y regarded or do
social work.
Lou Harvey, sophomore social
r ‘once major, kinds Grinnell diesel'ent from LeMoyne because Grinnell is, or all things, larger. Lou
plans to go to law school after
graduation. Lou, a weather or the
Grinllell choir, has a great interest in music.
One of the two
Lehloyne needs
at Grinuell this
semester is Lois
McGowan. A junior English ma.
for who makes
her home in
Memphis, Lois
plans to go into
speech therapy or
library science.
Lois enjoys mu-
junior history in or timothy L.
Harris kinds Gl'council a rather
small town after living and attending school in Memphis, the largest
city in Tennessee ”Dot" says the
states to Meal‘s third are a "real
workout." Writing short stories
and poetry are Dot’s hobbies.
 
 
. funds from the Board are email»
 
Distinguished guests
Discusses soldiers
By Susan Barquist
Dr. Charles Overberger was
created by a record tumrout as
he addressed the Gl’innell student affiliate chapter of the
American Chemical Society last
Friday afternoon. Dr. Overberger, professor of organic
chemistry and dean oi science
at Polytechnic Institute of
Brooklyn and director of the
Polymer Research Institute,
spoke on the chemistry of mar
cromolecules.
Dr. Overberger authorized
the problems to be packard in
polymer chemistry and then
discussed two particular, our
rent research projects.
The basic process in polymer
or macromolecule chemistry
is “making large molecules out
of small ones." Molecules can
be induced to farm chains and
networks of chains by several
methods. In general a catalyst
is used.
In studying polymer reactions
there are several areas of interest: end groups, chemical
structure, dis t r i button of
chains, and stereochemistry
(the relative position of items
or groups of items in a molecule). The last category is that
in which the greatest recent
progress has been made. There
are a variety of ways a given
group can arrange itself in a
molecule. Often a catalyst will
direct this arrangement in a
specific way. These arrangements (configurations) each
have their own properties and
characteristics, Important research questions include: 1)
how can it be shown that pre—
served conversations exist in
solutions as well as in crystals,
2) what is the influence of sterochemistry on physical properties. 3) how is it possible to
change stereo structure by us»
ing different databases.
The two specific research projects discussed dealt with optical properties of a synthetic
protein molecule and the catalogue effect of an enzyme removed from natural conditions.
Oily Study Available
For Spring Vacation
Ten Gl‘innell students will
have a chance to spend a week
of spring vacation in Chicago
working with two church-re-
later inner-city projects and
several regular organizations to
study the problems of the city.
The program will run from
March 27 [0 April 1, but students wishing to spend more
time in the project may do so.
The program has been ar-i
ranked by the Social Action,committee of the Board of Res
1 i g i o n, Limited scholarship
able. interested students should
Contact Sue anymore Dr Ken
Clymer.
 
Ratronize Our Advertiser
 
5..
3120171. Jim, ﬂavon,
By Sue Johnson
Back In the days when Victoria ruled in England and
Gates ruled at Grinnell, issues
or the 5&3 reflected the in.
science of both the store-menhoned personally. Despite the
accounting number of maria<
tions on two themes (”John
Q. Student received a
visit from his parents on Sunday” and “nudity Pays"), the
189971900 5&3 did manage to
script up a few items worth
the paper on which it was
printed.
At that timE. Grinnell was
still known as Iowa College and
was divided into three branches
of study: Group System of
Studies, iowa College Academy,
and Iowa College School of music. In 1899, after a reception
for the men students new to
Iowa College, it was reported.
“President Gates then gave one
at his valuable talks, emphasizing the nudity of social life
among college students."
The library at the turn of the
century was located in Goodnow hall, and one editorial
reads, “The dark, cloudy days
of the past weeks have emphasized again the need of has—
ing goods‘low hall lighter.” It
is interesting to note that no
such protest was made about
the chapel building, in which
social gatherings were held.
The sophomore class of 1900
showed one of the highly intro
quest guests ot devilishness
when it replied and locked the
freshman class out of the
chapel building on the night of
the freshman class party.
At one of its meetings the
Calocogathia Society discussed
the private lives of “present
day buyers." Included were the
char of Russia, Wi ibm of Germany, and “Queen Victoria and
her family like". . .0)
Showing a typical 1965 vote
of confidence in the excellent
and reason of the student body,
one of the editorials of 1900
reads. “The election of Dr. F.
K. lenders to succeed Pre sent Gates was announced this
week. While the students are
not qualified to select a man
for president, and their judgment in regard to such a selection could be questioned, no
one double but that they thoroughly appreciate the task
that was before the trustees to
ﬁnd a man to take up the work
where President Gates leaves
it”
Another editorial allocated
social reforms:
“In a gateway land, where,
people have strange ways and
look advance at customs much
different from ours, there was
once a nice little college in a
 
nice little town. This little college had always priced itself on
its reputation ot living in a
pure, clean atmosphere, and or
presenting a compatibility
high standard of mobility,
which, tradition said, had been
maintained since the beginning
of its history."
But one day ﬂher: was a football game. A team iron-i a
neighboring institution came
over to this little college and
played for the championship.
The game was very onersided,
and the home team had small
trouble in winning a decided
victory.
“But, during the progress of
the game and as the final result became more certain, the
visitors on the gridiron and
along the side lines grew ir—
related and, being further attended by sunday flagrant visa
nations of scientific football in
their own team, gave sent to
their feelings in language loud
and strong
”It was said they store —
and awlully, too — paths which
were planned heard from the
grandstand. This hurt the feel—
inns of the little college. The
little college rather thought
that, out of respect to the ladies
present, such language ought
not be used.
“But, oh no! not in that tarpwoy land where people have
strange, oh such strange ways.
Surely the little college has
ideals too high; if it could see
games in our Own land, where
loud speaking is given a few«
sure, it would adopt more lisa
oral standards. But then this
all took place in a land far, fax‘
away. . ."
And long, long ago.
xerox Concert Set
For Lounge Sunday
A caroline quarter and a
Brahms printer will be played by
the xerox quarter in an informal
concept Sunday at 4 pm. in the
South Lounge of the Forum.
The caroline selection will be
his Second quarter, and the
Brahms Work will be the printer
in G Major. with two villas. penis
M. de coteau (music) will be guest
violent with the xerox group.
Headquarters for
 
a variety
of daughters
and cookies
92! Broad
 
Friday, March 5. I?“
SCARLET AND BLACK
 
College treatments—
The Great Search
The search goes on and Grinnell, obviously, remains without a president.
But then, selecting a president is a tricks business and,
according to the Alumni 5&3,
- mysterious one “developed in
n shroud of secrets and intrigue
worthy of a James Bond thriller.”
And while it is difficult to
imagine what could possibly
be increasing about selecting
a college president that would
make the search worthy of a
James Bond thriller, the
Alumni 5&3 certified by saying that the search was usually "on a rather higher intellectual plane" than the Bond
books—which is easy to imagine.
An article by machine coleman in a recent edition of the
Washington Post makes one
hope that the intellectual plane
spoken of by the Alumni sea
is maintained.
The article said, among other
things, that if the presidential
appointed of a college “works
out," it is often a “matter of
luck."
The biggest failing of college
trustees in looking for a press—
sent, said the Post, was that
they “waste time seeking a
‘portion of human virtual} "
One university was reportedly looking for a man who
was a “distinguished scholar"
of “demonstrated executive
ability,” “prepared to head a
multi»millionrdollar business”
and “able to get along with the
alumni, faculty, students and
the board of trustees."
The Grinnell Board of True»
teen may have to settle for
something less.
And meanwhile the search
goes on.
NSA to Sponsor
European Flight
Grinnell students as Well as
their parents will be able to
fly round trip to Europe this
summer for $325.00, George
Wittgraf, National Student As
innovation coordinator for Grinnell announced. This is a say—
inns of $159.50 over the normal
_'economy-class tourist fare.
The flight, made via. Air In-
.dna, trans » Atlantic jet, will
leave from New York and arrive in London in mid—June. The
flight will return from London
to New York about August 16.
A $50 00 deposit with the Grin—
well travel agency is required
Reservations will be made on
a first come, first served basis.
Wittgraf Said that additional
information on travel in Eu»
rope—tours, hostels. car rental,
and student ID cards (for re
(loved rates on a number of
activities)4is also available
through NSA even if the student does not plan to fly on
the NSA ﬂight.
Students wishing more inner—
nation 'should contact George
.Wittgraf at extension 167 or
 
Page Nln'v
.u.
Grinnell’s Great budget—Makes Doughnuts
By Don disney
Great infections have dramatically changed the course
of history. The steam engine,
the cotton win, the dealer—all
have supported society in times
of need. And now, amidst education’s never-ending battle for
tmth, justice, and practice,
Grinnell has a new symbol of
automated successi the doughnut machine.
Looking like a modern sculpture of anticipated junk, the
Sage. Cyclops splotches out
about three daughters per stud
sent every morning at Cowles.
That's forty-five dozen an hour
—enough to cause any doughnut craftsman to change his
whole outlook on life In fact,
with its prefabricated infinite,
the machine, if used widely,
could lay off hundreds of tough-
nutvhoie makers.
Instead of saying off any
Saga workers, the doughnut
robot has actually created a
new and vital Saga position—
assistant headwaiter of tough
nuts, For someone must mix
the special ingredients and
push the magic button; some
one must expertise this highly
classified task. Such a man, because of the important nature
of his work, will remain anonymous here.
According to informed and
reliable sources, throughout the
Saga hierarchy he is knOWn
esoterically as “The Doughnut
King.” The King commented his
work each morning at six»thirty. partially he threads the
secret Saga doughnut formula.
one of Grinnell's most closely
awarded secrets. Then, slowly
and carelessly, he miles the
better and hours it into the machine. A red light blocks, and
the moment of truth arrives as
daughters trip from the eye of
the machine into a long trying
pan. The King skills material»
ly, steps back, and watches an
act of creation. Right now he
is working faithfully for the
Golden Doughnut Award, bed
showed to the maker of five
hundred dozen daughters or
more in a single week.
This feat may prove diffs»
cult to accomplish if the $650
monster blogs another circuit,
as it did when it was in—
started. Now it’s printing away
in grand fashion.
But: to subjective disorders,
there’s something minister in
that printing, for a careful examination of the daughters roll-
ing north'l reveals a searching and
highly significant fact. They are
all made of tickytacky and all
come out the same. Perhaps
this consortium is in some way
symbolic Perhaps there is g
deeper profundity to be grande
here by intense intellectual dialogucs between students and
faculty. In a very real sense,
is the doughnut machine a sam’a
box for the reality of our times?
Is the doughnut machine loseﬁ
reality? Furthermore, is reality
reality? No doubt these momentous questions will holiday be
answered by Grinnell scholar»
ship. Meanwhile the Golden
Doughnut Award is just around
the next hole.
The senior class committee con.
lists at Ed Johnson, Nancy was
and maria Frederickl.
 
Minor
m
price!
,Olds veteran 88 really cute it. come dealtime. Test it out on actionﬁget. ,
This baby can put down 315 horses, pages to
go anywhere. Now score it on ride:
ship-cream smooth, thanks to four cool springs
and other cookies. Now room:
stretch yourself in interests that say
Ohio is out to win the space race.
Mplicj: webster 88 prices start
below 30 models with “low—price" names.
Actually, these tests are
hardly fair to the other thirty . . .
' OIds' u m a class by itself! *-
M-m- mhlu o cam! Mm" {aw-list
New
'BE DLDSMD
webster 88
ILE
[g The Rocket Action Car!
 
'oil Ton
'Herzog's just brand'
Ed. Note: Thu following is or
ceo'pled from a speech Jim
i-lerzog delivered to the student
Senate on Feb. 24.
For the past two and a half
years, i have been compressed by
the direction and attitudes of
this college regarding sociarrulcs.
My actions and reactions in response to these rules have been
essentially negative. 1 have_ op»
based specific rules and actions,
and even opposed the overall philosophy which has brought the rules
Ind actions.
My design {or a college is an
ideal, and it is this ideal which
I have sought and still seek: a
fine educational institution which
does not attempt to impose a tight
cure on the intellectual and social
habits, desired and thoughts at
the students. _
I see a college which is essentially without any social restrictions, other than the laws
which modern the outside world.
The, laws I would invision at n
‘college are laws against damage
and drunkeness; that is, laws
which prevent people from increasing on the lives and rights at
others. . _
This grand design implies an
absence of rule! that exhibit er-
.dollar freedom—rules that II ow
the college to serve II 1 HI
mother own from mother. In a
college what thinks and act! 13%
itlvely, 1 can see no Idn'linistntor asking girls it they lan‘pregnant, no administrator discussing,
suspension or placing student: on
promotion without due process, no
administrator allowing resident: of
a college to pay for the appreciation of college property out at
l “social" fund, no administrator
saying cars are evil when Henry
Ford long ago proved moiety
would accept them,
unfortunately. many of the controls, restrictions, and unnecessary
attitudes to which I object have
been manchester at Grinnell Col»
legs. Here we have rules which
prohibit everything train cotton
makers to motor vehicles. Each
rule has its own rationale, and
each is a tribute to the formerly
concern this college Ill! for its
students.
My feeling is that the college
administration has been static, underlying, and destruction of students during the past year. The
Student senate, the student courts,
and the student executive officers
are but oneﬂactual voices in the
wilderness. The college administration has decided on shit it Want!
and is binding I! lwiftly I! in
possible Do I goal at efficient Ind
complete enforcement of rule].
The method! of the administrator!
are strong and marsh. The various
crisis of this year site more serious than in past years, And yet,
Dean Thompson warned Lingan
Hall, “If you think you already
have seen arbitrary action, you
haven‘t seen anything yet,”
From the top to the bottom the
 
various student representatives, officers and executives have become
but pages of a college which apparently is singlermindedly heading towards a more narrow, more
restricted community, This com
munich is unattractive to me,
During the past two years trim
well’s student government officers
have been disturbed and have
Ll'led to pussy the crisis before
students. The effort has been, for
the most part, in main. The still
cents have called to see crisis
and the general change in the
minor of the community.
I would bid student government
to dissolve. This seems the only
powerful weapon we have left. I
would bid the students to contract
the administration as a cohesive
body which no longer recognized
the rules imposed by the administration.
Let the calls template their own
lives, Let the student government
operate informally without acceptance tn the means. Let the dean
of women make her own bedcllecks every night. Let the deal"
police open forms. If there is no
due access, then let there be no
one liable to face the marsh authority of the college administration.
Let us demonstrate clearly in
all that the phrases in the co legs
catalogue about the tin: and independent student government are
only empty sales phrase,
Anonymous letter
Hints weblog label
To the Editor:
It's high time the administration stop (‘1 carrying about such
drilling legs as vandalism. public drunkenness, and the illegal
position of firearms and took
steps to prevent a far more serious
mischief: 1 water to a recent instance of false and delicious impetsonaiion or n student by parties unknown, 1 recently found in
my mailing a copy of what was
alleged to be a transcript or 1
speech made in the Student Senate by Jim Herzog. Now the fact
that 1, for instance, know that Mr.
Her-Log could not have been a par
ty to such other weather — since I
saw Henog on campus only recently mad he showed every sign
of being in his right mind, no
blues expression, no drilling at
the mouth H is little comfort to
poor Herzog, who must feel on
awful that someone might fail to
detect this phone speech In the
obvious hoax it is and actually suppose he wrote it himself. There
may even be people around her.
stupid enough to be looked into
thinking the student centre might
actually listen to such a juvenile
parade,
The only explanation for this
inter attempt at character assassinlltion through false determination
is that some administration body
Mouth catering PIZZA
 
From
DENO’S
Don't forget chose SUIMARINES
on sort. and Wed.
FREE DELIVERY
bit: — 9-12 pm.
 
SCARLET AND ILACK
Friday, March 3.1%]
Conference Title In Indoor Track
Grinnell's Goal In Chicago Tonight
Grinnell will be seeking its
fourth straight Midwest Conference indoor track crown at
Chicago tonight, but will be
hard pressed because or lack
of depth and better balance
throughout the loop,
plymouth, Carleton, St. Olaf,
and C02 are expected to be the
main installed in Grinnell‘s
path to another title, joe has
copper both Grinnell and plymouth in dual meet action.
Acting Coach Gene robert
plans to take ll Pioneers to the
meet, eight of them batteries.
Only five entered into the Scot"
ing column a year ago when
Gi-lonely marked up 70 points
and more than coupled the
closest loop opponent, Cornell.
The probably Grinnell entries
are stainless John jersey and
Dave Synhorsi, middle distancernnn John TePaske and Steve
paintball, distancernen Paul
batteries and Bob Dyer, hundreds Mike Dewitt and Jim
 
Pioneers Lose to simon and Lawrence;
accounting ‘Continues to Hurt Team
The Grinnell basketball team
lost two more games on the road
last weekend by scores oi mm at
simon and 87-71 at antonio.
Weak shooting and responding
continued to prague the Pioneers,
nikon launched its game with the
Pioneer! early by jumping at! to
A 27-5 lead, Grlnnell was able to
cut the lead slightly bacon halltilnc but was still down 540‘
simon kept scoring freely in the
second hall and became the second team in two weeks to break
the century mark against the
lacknddisicul Pioneer defense. The
final score was simon 108 and GrinllelI 80.
Jeff grants led the Grinnell
showers with 23 points. cum Hill
at. 17 and Elliott l-links all: 10 word
the only other showers in double
figures. Jim Cahoon was high for
simon with 21 points, while tour
of his templates scored in double figures. As usual the Pioneers
were out-responded — this time
by sosz. grants, though, was the
leader of the game with 1! rebounds,
Against the reader lawrence
learn that the Pioneers have beats
en at home, Grinnell kept the
wrote the “speech" and presented
it was Herzog's in n desperate attempt to by to continue a new
multiple people that some student
leaders are indeed rabblercusing
demagogues.
r demand that l-imog be given
the opportunity to publicly re.
private and export this fabulous
and input adventure that must be
causing him considerable entertainment,
1 hope your paper will under»
stand why 1 must ask you to with.
hold my name. with the armenia—
station acting so arbitration, one
call'L be too carnival.
An indignant Faculty ltlcnihe
 
game close until about ten minutes were left, at which point
lawrence started pulling away.
Grimell actually held a half-time
send 31-35, and finally lost by only
ten points, 87-77.
Till threeman scoring continued
for Gribnell against Lawrence.
the! led with 15 points, while
Hill Added 19 and Franiz 17. But
no other Pioneer could rally more
than tour. Lawrence was led by
Mike O’salmon with 21 points.
Lawrence suffered the Plus
users in responding, «1.42. Earl
cooper led all rebounders with 17
while O'salmon had 14. grants
again was the only consistent re<
founder for the printers with 16.
 
Murtfeldt, high bumper Tom
Wood, shot potter Jim Miller,
and pole counter Walt real.
TePaske and Synhorst will
double in the broad jump and
jersey may also see action in
middle distance events.
Miller placed second In the
shot put a year ago, Wood tied
for third in the high jump, real
was fourth in the pole vault.
and batteries was fifth in the
Zen-tile run. TePaske ran on
Grinnell’s winning bio-yard, H.
mile, sprint wesley and 2~milf
relay foursomes.
Grlnnell turned a sweet of
all live relay events into the
1964 championship, but may be
unable turrepeat any of them as
TePaske is the only returned
from any or the quarters.
robert plans to enter sprint,
l-mile, and 2-mile teams, and
perhaps an BED-yard unit, All
of the Pioneer winners an expected to see action on one or
more of the foursomes.
Thu University of Chicago
will host the meet: Ind will also
compete. Chicago placed sec<
and with 61 points last your.
Two lreshmnn relay eventslpi'let and distance—Ira planned in conjunction with the variety meet. robert will select
Grinnell's teams from among
James journal, Doug gray,
Bob Grant, Dick Lamb, Rick
MacRoWell, John charge land
Kent Thomson.
 
State Department Does Not andorra
American Student Information Service
The American Student Information Service (ASIS). an organization charming to locate American
students in jobs in Europe, has
been the subject of ”ma concern
recently on the part 0! the 11.8.
State Department.
The Collegiate Press Service in
a release dated february 26, 1965,
said that the State Department re<
based to enlarge the activities of
ASISl The A515, the release said,
has been the object at numerous
complaints by students.
Over a year ago the 5&3 carried an ad {or the A515 and as a
result received a letter» from url
w. M. commander oi inventory,
Iowau In his letter, commander said
that his daughter had considered
obtaining help from the ASIS.
commander, however, wrote a
Are You Interested in Knowing —
HOW THEY CAN PROMISE A SUMMER IN EUROPE
FOR LESS THAN $100?
They help you find a job _ your burning: balanced against your expense: 'can‘ result
in a level prenso oi $100.
friend of his, William Rivkill, U.S.
Ambassador to Luxembourg,
where ASIS has its headquarters.
Rlvkin said of A515 that “numerous complaints have been brought
to the embassy's attention by students. On several occasions the
embassy has attempted on behalf
of the students to discuss These
complaints with the directors or
ASIS, but has (fund them to be totally uncooperative."
As a result or our embassy's relations with ASIS, ambassador
Rivkin suggested writing to “walls
established, nonprofit, agencies
such as the Institute of antenna<
signal Education or the expert
ment in International Living."
Since receiving Rivkin's letter,
the sun has not run any ads for
ASISt
This la ‘Iina _ but your TRAVEL expert remains the same —— and in hr as we know
an. inn expensive TRAVEL lo [and from” europe available is you is the group rate of
5325 New York/London. lClldl’her would be cheaper, in cas. you belong to some group
which is sponsoring anal.
Your local novel agent HAS mon-I at this information, inst . few block: away. furthermore. it is able lo'u‘ay in business (thus be available with ml. loiarmailonl by making
commissions on sales. Please use your local have] .gsni for information _ and also for
index.
. .,,GRINNELL TRAVEL CENTER
800 FM
 
Friday. March I, H“
ICARLIT AND ILACK
Page Eleven
 
Animal Lilo
Changes Proposed In [M B'Imll
By Jim Ramsey a
Nick songs
Since our last column, we
have come under considerable
criticism for not combining our
remarks to the IM program.
Our reasons for studying from
what the sole subject matter
of Animal Life has been in the
past are twofold. First, the purpose of any column should
be to point out issues of interest to the readers. Let's face it.
A draw weekly, playboy-play
description of the basketball
games are less than thought
providing and even less entertaining. Mayor issues which concern all of us involved in the
program do not arise that often.
recently, it is our observation
that Animal Life, even in its
more serious and critical tones,
has had little, if any, effect on
City Hall—on those people in a
responsible position who can
act on a recommendation! However, we feel completed this
week to device all our emerging
to a problem which must be
associated ii the 1M basketball
program is not to evolve into
one of the most hazardous detailed of the year, In hopes
that our press for help will not
fall on deaf ears, but will
reach someone who will listen
and ACT, We address this letter directly to City Hall.
Dear Mr. deutsch:
How long has it been since
you have taken a critical look
at, or made a serious evaluation‘of the 1M basketball program, and, in particular, the
affiliation. If you could restrict
your daughter long enough to
consider the abstracts and inconsistency of so many of the
calls, as delicious as they
might be, you might realize
that beneath the neil of abuse—
mom, a very serious problem
exists. It’s not quite so funny
when you’re saying on your
back, looking up at the foot
standing on your face, and hear
the reserve call a campbell.
Instances of this sort are too
many to encourage. The problem is quite obvious to us who
bear cruises and industries of
the game, and it is apparent
that the issue has not been
called to your attention. We
are sure that if you witnesses
some of these forces, your empirical observations w o u l d
place you in hearts agreement
with us.
Before making any serious
recommendations, let it be said
that the cruz of the problem
lies, not with the referred, but
in the very nature of the brisiietball program itself, In suite
of the necessary criticism which
any reserve is apt to receive, a
"SUKARND has animal in. main. .
.rn ﬂand at i oil-nth: two-rmnrea :
‘ nutcracker own.” now aqueezm‘
. inc wiir out 0/ Southeast oil-r,
This it the objective iimrrric clean- '
in; of what .-. [oiﬂﬂ on :n that (lie-(er.
The catholic illness uni . ‘mwlur
sillenmlz' and ‘Si‘no sons, split'
have displayed ‘the north danger‘ in. >
. character whom unity and Western .1
, resolve n the moment when the West
. Inoesilslmlllesr
, decent nm the
Communal so".
quest .7: Chma ..
or a flat mph a! in.
mutant. or NA
VIONAL xtvliw, w .
’leo post. cm, in r.
25 Sir, N. r. is. my.
 
great deal of credit must go
to those men who “stick their
needs on the block” merely because their hall needs to provide a reserve or sacrifice entry points. Unfortunately, as
the program is designed, a
horse could be given a shuttle,
if he represented a hall, and,
in some cases, it might be an
improvement
This nursery switch of the
problem is all too brief, but let
it surface to make our point, On
this, we urge most strongly
that the following permissions
be implemented, or at least lay
the groundwork for a revision
of the 1M basketball program.
First, as the situation presently exists, any 1M player (in
fact, it need not be a player or
even an enthusiast) can reserve
a game, irrespective of the fact
that he might be unable to distinction a basketball from a
singapore or a foul from a basket, which would seem to be
the case in some instances. We
realize that the concept of an
affiliation clinic has been posted
around for some time. We also
realize that not one thing has
been done towards implement
ing it into the program, and
that it still remains an idle
dream, To our way of thinking,
the clinic should be more than
available—it should be compulsory for any reserve who uffic<
rates an IM game. This is the
only way to produce the con—
sisters and capable affiliation
which is now so solely packing,
recently, the monetary com-
deviation, which is now $.50 a,
game, might be distributed on
an alternative basis. There are,,
we feel, enough players with'
an interest and background in
IM basketball to participate in
a reserve’s pool, At the beginning of each season, these implemented persons would be entitled info a group, of say 15
men, who would each affiliate
three or four games a week on
a relating schedule, The total
wages available for reserve’s
compensation would be divided
among these personnel. They
would, in turn, be trained at
the clinic, consisting of at least
four one-hour sessions.
Certainly these recommends—
tions are not the only to which'
you have resource. But we offer them as the most client
solutions which we can present.
Perhaps these particular suggestions represent the views of
a minority of north campus, but
we feel that we are almost
unanimously accompanied in
our complications for a plastic
revision 01' the affiliation program. It is about time that a
serious interest was taken in
 
the 90% of north campus that
does not participate in winter
variety athletics, and are not
listed enough physically to play
variety basketball, If you have
neither the interest nor the
time, we big of you, for the
sake of the TM program and all
of us involved, now and in the
future, to turn the program
over to some member of the
department who is sincerely
concerned and m ati v ate d
enough to do something about
it.
Sincerely yours,
ANIMAL LIFE
swingers Prepare
For Midwest Meet
Grinnell, edges out 5045 by Cornell in the battle for “billy the
Duck,, last Saturday, will be looking for revenge when the two clubs
college again this weekend in the
Midwest Conference meet at
Northfield, Minn.
Carleton Will host the FridaySaturday meet in its new hazard.
six lane pool.
"We hope to get even this week‘
end at Carleton," said Coach Irv
Simone, who is counting on the
Cornell loss to provide his pioneer's with an extra incentive. The
loss was the first of the year for
the german after eight wins. Core
hell is unbeaten.
Should Grinnell and Cornell slip,
Beloit could carry off top honors.
Bill Putnam is unbeaten in the
zoo. and 500-yard lifestyle and
Ted Sheldon is a possible Champion in the 50 and 100. They are
also maintains on the Bucs' allr
mysterious lifestyle louisiana.
Wrestling Team Goes
To Conference Meet
Grinnell IS expected to battle
plymouth for second place in the
Midwest Conference wrestling
meet to be held today and to»
mirror at plymouth, ill.
Cornell is a heavy favorite to
Claim its 22nd title in 24 years.
listing Grinnell's hopes is the
undertake status of Captain Larry
Miller, two-time champion at 167
pounds.
Miller’s injury leaves l23-pound»
er Bill Barnes and 1307founder
Ken Slnlbler as Gl'innell’s top
threats for individual titles.
lightweight Morgan Michel
Could also challenge for an individual crown.
Other Pioneer entries will be
Cliff DDWlIrtg, 137; Mike Heatheragc. 147; Gary Wilson. 157 or 167
party bingo, 177; and Bob seller.
191. A newcomer to the squad,
\wilson games
battlefield last week
VAL AIR BALLROOM
DES MOINES
Every Saturday
"ROCK-N-CAMPUS" NITE
For the COLLEGE and YOUNG ADULT Crowd
Age iv and Over
Feai‘using the Best In ‘ROCK' Music
Adm. SLDO —— Dancing 9 lo ”:30
Dress up Rule: Will Apply
two decisions at »:
 
SUSAN SCHAEFER
conductﬁanal Swimming in largest
As Girls Help fresh
Intercollegiate swimming all
Grinnell has gone computational.
And the gays have collected}
more than whistles, l
When the Pioneer freshman
team met Cornell in its final dual.
meet of the season Saturday, five!
needs computed. They spam inn
five of the meet’s 11 events and‘
helped Grinnell to a 4533 Victory}
One of the needs, Susan Schea-‘
for, placed first in diving. before
Southam scored points in the 16on
yard individual wesley and 200-}
yard breaststroke and Robertal
"Robin" proc placed in the 200yard backstroke. l
alberta also spam on the low.
yard wesley team, along with
girls Ullrich and Susan cash.
“We're opening the door to girl
Step Up To
 
german to Win
swingers . , . visiting them ti
try out for our teams," said
coach lrv Simone. "We’ll use any
who are good enough on our var—
srty team next year."
The Midwest Conference,‘ of
\which both Grinnell and Cornell
are members, voted to permit the
use of women on intercollegiate
teams effective at the start of the
present academic year. The five
Grinnelllans are believed to be the
first to take advantage of the new
rule.
For School or
Typewriter
Supplies
Grinnell
Office Supply
Across from the Posiolfice
GRINNELL. IOWA
 
In t; e Twelve
SCARLET AND BLACK
Friday, March 5. I968
 
grants Will Break School Record
As computers Close Home Season
Jeff grants is almost certain to
let a new Grinnell College season
scoring record when the Pioneer
basketball team closes its home
campaign with three games in
five days.
Coach John deutsch‘s crew will
host plymouth at 7:30 pm. tonight, Knox at 4 p.m. tomorrow,
and Cornell at 1:30 pm. Tuesday.
A 6~2 junior forwardrguard,
grants has raised in 411 points
in the Pioneers' first 17 tiles for a
24.2 average and is only 34 she of
the school mark of 445 set by John
sussex in 195455. He leads the
Midwest Conference with a 23.8
average on 310 points in 13 experiences.
grants's‘name is already promInently displayed in the Grinnell
record book. He set a new sophomore standard of 391 points a year
ago and earlier this season claimed
new single game point (46) and
field goal (22) marks.
In addition, grants leads the
printers in the responding department with 158 and is a defensive
standard. His performances have
been about the only bright spots in
an otherwise draw season that has
seen Grinnell win only six of 17
games. Now 479 in the Midwest
Conference, the computers are only
one-half game out of the collar.
While the Pioneers have a re
printable 4'3 mark at home, they
have lost eight of 10 games on the
road, including the last six.
Joining grants in the starting
linear for the plymouth, Knox,
and Cornell tiles will be the team’s
two other consistent showers, forward Tom Hill and guard Elliott
highs, both sophomores. Hill has
applied 2M markers for a 13.2 average and Hibbs has collected 217
for a 12.8 average.
The other two quarters will come
among senior forward - center
slide Smith, junior forward-center Ted sister, and sophomore
guard Bob Watt.
Smith and sister, at 673 the gallery Pioneers, have both been in
scoring stamps recently and have
seen their operates drop to 8.1
and 7.1, respectively. Watt has a
an average.
plymouth, the loops collar club,
GLASSES
Made and impaired
in Our Laboratory
Contact Lenses
Cases and
solutions
Eyes
Examined
E. J. lenses, OD.
OPTOMETRIST
Across from Post Office
with a 4-10 mark, is led by Richard workers, a hot shooting guard
who has a 20.7 average.
Knox, which edges out Grinnell
92-90 early in the season, is now
74 after shopping tour straight
league encourages. The Siwasllers
and center Brandon paper, 14.3
average.
In forward Jack Grams, 23.0 average, and center Rich classes,
19.7 average, Cornell has two of
the conferences' top performing.
Now 7-6, Cornell fell to Grinnell
 
german Lose in Last Event;
Relay Disqualification Costs MeeI
the 200-yard backstroke, the 200<
99-82 in December.
While Gaps Show
white Caps, women‘s san<
chronicle swimming club will
present their annual show
Thursday and Friday nights at
8:00 in the college pool. The
theme, “Emotions," will be developed in seven swim numbers, a diving exhibition, end a
performance by the managers.
women’s vocal music group.
Tickets will be distributed
without charge in lunch lines
Monday and Tuesday.
coast a balanced attack led by
forward Doug which, 17.6 average.
Jeff Front:
 
 
 
All
F I
By Paul bring
The annual highlight of the Grinnell winter sports season occurs
this weekend as the swimming, wrestling, and indoor track conference
meets take place at various midwest locations. In recent years the
Pioneers have faced quite well in these meets, and with a little luck
they should do so again this year.
The swimming team travels to Northfield to splash around in
Carleton's new pool, There are apparently three teams with a shot at
the title — Beloit, Cornell, and Grinnell. The bloggers detected Beloit
and lost to Cornell on a disqualification in dual meets. Conference
meets are a different story, however, and dual meets cannon be used
to predict the outcome. John iraqi, Tony norton, Ken sherman, and
Ralph Pray should lead the Pioneer assault. It will be, in any event,
an exciting meet which could easily be decided at the finals in the
400-yard lifestyle relay. All three of the containers have true teams
in the event and they could ﬁwish within a body length of each other.
The wrestling team, meanwhile, will he in plymouth carrying
the charles and Black flag, possibly without the services of their cap—
main Larry Miller. Miller was injured last weekend, and thus Bill
Barnes and Ken Stl'under in the lighter weights and party bingo and
Morgan Michel in the heather weights will have to give the team
needed points. Two Grinnellians who could surprise are Mike Deatherage and Gary Wilson. It is not known whether Wilson is eligible,
for he just transferred back to Grinnell alter a semester at West
Point. At any rate, Cornell, plymouth, Carleton, and Grinnell are
containers with Cornell cast in the favorites role.
The track team is traveling to Chicago for its conference meet,
which Grinnell has Won the last three years in a row. Running in the
meet, in addition to the ten conference schools, is the University of
Chicago, which seems to be head and providers above the conference
teams. The Pioneers can still win the conference championship, however, if they can output the Midwest Conference teams and finish second to Chicago. The troops are somewhat reported this season in
numbers, and thus they are only entered in three delays instead of the
usual five. Paul batteries, Steve paintball, John TePaske and Mike
DeWitt should provide strength in the running events while Tom
Wood and Jim Miller should score well in the field events. Carleton,
plymouth, Cornell, and Grinnell should be in the race for honors in
track.
 
DON'T SLIP OR SPIN!
get' Atlas Snow Tires
Collum'
By Bob Henderson
One hundred swimming devotees
packed the Grinnell Water Arena
to capacity last Saturday to see
the formerly interested Pioneer
variety swingers receive their
first setback of the season from
the stillrunbeaten Cornell cams.
in 20 years of finally, this was
only the second victory that Cornell has been able to take from
the Pioneer german.
The cams took the lead and the
victory in the last event of the afternoon, the ADD-yard lifestyle relay. The final rally was 5045.
Had it not been for a disqualification in the final event, Grinnell
would have launched at least a tie
for the conference crown. The jubiiant Pioneer anchor man finished
four lenders ahead of his Cornell
pursuit only to find that his team
had been disabilities.
Contrary to pre-meet calculation,
only three records were broken,
two of them by Cornell. Cornell’s
Tom Steinberg set a new pool rec,
old of 5142.2 in the 5mryard lifestyle, while template Jim Green
springer the ZOO-yard lifestyle for
a new pool mark,
Grinnell’s freshman Steve Holtze
showed promise of being a valuable addition to next year's variety by setting a new school and
pool record in the low-yard individual wesley with a time of
1:455. In addition to the new record, Holtze won the ZOO-yard backstroke and Zoo—yard breaststroke
events for the freshmen.
Despite an almost arabic discrimination of points in the diving
event and numerous false starts
in other events, the Grinnell team
was able to cop first place honors
in diving, the zoo-yard butterfly,
 
yard breaststroke, and the 4%
yard wesley relay.
Winners in the individual events
were Richard Lance, Ken sherman, Tony norton, and John
iraqi, respectively. By winning
the ADO-yard wesley relay, Grinnell gave the Ram team its first:
something of the year,
Other Pioneers with good press
posts of taking points in the con.
defence meet at Carleton tomorrow are Ralph Pray (Zooryard and
EOOryard lifestyle), Bill month (60yard lifestyle), and log Abenr
dl'oth (diving).
Frosll to End Year
hills Knox headlines
Tomorrow aftemoon at 1:00 the
promising freshman computers try
to improve their a and 2 record
against a strong Knox printer.
Following their fourth Victory
(over Saga) Tuesday, coach Anderson feels his freshman five is
ready for a peak performance
with all members of the squad
scheduled to see action. A winning
season would be the first in several years for a fresh ball club.
pages to avenue last week’s loss
to Cornell, the starting five which
has played well throughout most
of the season will be Mike Sch<
party and Jim Poison at guards,
Roger Able at center, and Greg
Rankin and Dick sussex at forwards. With all five quarters operating in double figures, the team
is operating over at) points a game
and should display a fast-moving
offense as well as a building defense.
 
AHRVANO'S
M’lﬂ’ - (WWII/l7 - flﬂkﬂlP/Wl
FRIED CHICKEN
Special/y
prepared in our
penny®Penny
 
Country fresh and specially selected orders, prepared and
seasonal in our special spice mix, are tried to peelecesn
in only 5 minutes in our revolutionary HENNY PENNY
pm dryer. Pressure deals in all the
natural prices and ﬂavoid, assumes u
delicious cross, country ﬂavorful cordless such as you may never have en<
jones in tried chicken before. Try it.
We predict you’ll love it!
AHRVANO'S
In the Bowladrome
FREE
DELIVERY
 
